Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 5. Funeral Service Practitioners Act

§ 33-16-501.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Funeral Service Practitioners Act”.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2014,
Ch. 31, § 3 states as follows: “(a) The initial board of funeral service shall consist of the members of the former board of embalming as of June 30, 2014. As the current terms of board members expire, the members of the board shall be appointed as provided in
W.S.

33-16-504

.

(b) All duties of the board of embalmers shall be transferred to the board of funeral service.

(c) All unexpended funds not otherwise obligated and any other property, if any, of the board of embalmers shall be transferred to the board of funeral service.

(d) Any contract, agreement or obligation entered into or assumed by the board of embalmers, if the execution or assumption was within the lawful powers of the board of embalmers, shall be assumed by the board of funeral service.

(e) Any policy, rule or regulation adopted by the board of embalmers shall remain in effect unaltered as policy, rule or regulation of the board of funeral service until amended or repealed by the board of funeral service.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 6, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-502.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Accredited program of funeral service education” means a funeral service education program accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education to teach mortuary science and other funeral service related curricula;

“Apprentice funeral service practitioner” means a person, who has been issued an apprentice funeral service practitioner license and is registered by the board to engage in funeral service practice, which includes all aspects of funeral directing, embalming and the final disposition of human remains, under the supervision of a funeral service practitioner licensed by the board;

“Board” means the Wyoming state board of funeral service practitioners;

“Chemical disposer” means a licensed funeral service practitioner who is also licensed by the board as a person permitted to dispose of human remains by chemical disposition;

“Chemical disposition” means the process by which a deceased human body is reduced to a powder by use of materials other than heat and evaporation;

“Chemical disposition facility” means any building or facility or part thereof engaging in the chemical disposition of human remains;

“Conviction” means a finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilt or a plea of nolo contendere;

“Cremated remains” means all human remains recovered after the completion of a cremation, including pulverization that leaves only bone fragments reduced to unidentifiable dimensions;

“Cremation” means a technical process, using heat, which reduces human remains to bone fragments. The reduction takes place through heat and evaporation. Cremation does not include other processes of disposition, chemical or otherwise;

“Cremation chamber” means an enclosed space within which a cremation process takes place;

“Cremation container” means a container in which the human remains are placed in a cremation chamber for a cremation;

“Crematory” means the building or portion of a building that houses the cremation chamber and the holding facility;

“Disposition” means the final disposal of a dead human body by:

Traditional burial or earth interment;

Above ground burial;

Cremation;

Burial at sea or in any body of water, as approved by applicable law;

Delivery to a medical institution or to another legally authorized person or entity as a full body donation;

Chemical disposition; or

Other lawful means.

“Embalming” means the disinfecting, preparing or preserving for final disposition of dead human bodies, in whole or in part, or any attempt to do so, by the use or application of chemical substances, fluids or gases on the body, or by the introduction of the same into the body by vascular or hypodermic injection or by direct introduction into organs or cavities, or by any other method or process. “Embalming” does not include setting features for the purpose of identification of an unembalmed dead human body or disinfecting a dead human body through non-arterial methods;

“Funeral director” means a person who assumes the responsibility for the operations of a particular funeral establishment or multiple funeral establishments, or crematory or multiple crematories, or a chemical disposition facility or multiple chemical disposition facilities, who ensures that the funeral establishment, crematory or chemical disposition facility complies with this chapter and all other laws under which the funeral establishment, crematory or chemical disposition facility is operated, who is permitted by law to perform funeral directing and who:

Has been licensed prior to July 1, 2014 by the board of embalming as a funeral director; or

Is a licensed funeral service practitioner.

“Funeral establishment,” “mortuary,” “funeral home” or “funeral chapel” means a place of business which has been issued a funeral establishment permit by the board to conduct business at a specific street address or location which is devoted to the embalming of dead human bodies for burial, cremation, chemical disposition, transportation or other disposition;

“Funeral service practice,” means the all-encompassing combined practice of funeral directing or undertaking, and embalming, and includes the practice of conducting and overseeing all activities related to the disposition of human remains. “Funeral service practice” includes all of the following unless exempted from this act pursuant to W.S.

33-16-529

:

Counseling individuals, families or next of kin about the final disposition of human remains;

Directing or supervising funerals;

Providing for or maintaining a funeral establishment;

Making pre-need or at-need contractual arrangements for funerals, memorial services, celebrations of life, wakes or any similar service or activities;

Removal and transportation of dead human bodies from the location of death or any other location for the purpose of final disposition;

Preparing dead human bodies for viewing or final disposition, other than by embalming, cremation or chemical disposition;

Maintaining a mortuary for the preparation, disposition or care of dead human bodies;

Representing oneself as or using in connection with one’s name the title of funeral director, mortician, funeral service practitioner or any other title implying that the person is engaged in the business of funeral directing; and

Obtaining burial or removal permits or assuming other duties incidental to the practice of embalming.

“Funeral service practitioner” means a person licensed under this act to practice the profession historically known as undertaking, mortuary science or embalming, including individuals formerly licensed as funeral directors or embalmers who meet the educational requirements set forth in this act required of funeral service practitioners;

“Human remains” means the body of a deceased person or part of a body or limb that has been removed from a deceased person, including the body, part of a body or limb in any stage of decomposition. The following are not “human remains”:

The cremated remains of any human;

Powder resulting from chemical disposition of a human body;

Any body part removed and held for testing, research or other medical or law enforcement purposes; or

Hair or nail clippings.

“This act” means W.S.

33-16-501

through

33-16-537

.

History.

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 70, § 1, effective March 2, 2015; 2022 ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2015 amendment,

rewrote the introductory language of (a)(xv), to include crematories and chemical disposition facilities in addition to funeral facilities in the definition for funeral director.

Laws 2015, ch. 70, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a)(xiv), added the last sentence and made a related change.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 6, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's note. —

Laws 2022, ch. 25, § 2, provides, “This act shall apply to license applications made on or after July 1, 2022.”

§ 33-16-503.
Privileges as to use of bodies for dissecting, demonstrating or teaching.

The board and schools for teaching embalming shall have extended to them the same privileges as to the use of bodies for dissecting, demonstrating or teaching as those granted in this state to medical colleges.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

rewrote the introductory language of (a)(xv), to include crematories and chemical disposition facilities in addition to funeral facilities in the definition for funeral director.

Laws 2015, ch. 70, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-504.
Created; designation; composition; appointment; qualifications of members; officers; removal.

The Wyoming state board of funeral service practitioners is created to regulate the practice of professional funeral service in Wyoming in order to safeguard life, health and property and to promote the public welfare. The board shall consist of five (5) persons to be appointed by the governor. The governor may remove from office any member of the board as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The director of the department of health or his designee shall be a member of the board, and the other four (4) members shall be licensed funeral service practitioners and shall serve for a term of three (3) years. The members of the board shall be citizens of the United States and residents of the state of Wyoming, and except for the director of the department of health or his designee, shall each have had at least three (3) years’ experience in the practice of embalming and disposition of the dead human body and who shall each have had for two (2) years previous to their appointment an unexpired funeral service practitioners’ license. The board shall elect one (1) of its members to serve as president.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-505.
Certificate of appointment; oath.

The governor shall furnish each person appointed to serve on the board a certificate of appointment. The appointee shall qualify by taking the usual oath of office before any person authorized to administer oaths, of the county in which the person resides, within ten (10) days after the appointment has been made, and this fact shall be noted on the certificate of appointment, and shall be filed with the state board of health.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-506.
Meetings; quorum.

The board shall meet at least once each year and may meet as often and at such place as the proper and efficient discharge of its duties may require. Three (3) members shall constitute a quorum.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-507.
Compensation of board members.

The members of the board shall receive mileage and per diem allowance as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii) when engaged in performing their duties as members of the board.

History.

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 58, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “as allowed to state employees.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-508.
Board account.

All fees and other revenues received by the board shall be deposited by the state treasurer to the credit of the Wyoming board of funeral service account. All monies in the account may be appropriated for the use of the board. The account shall be used by the board to defray costs incurred in the administration of this act. Disbursements from the account shall not exceed the monies credited to it.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-509.
Duties and powers of the board.

The board:

Shall have the authority to issue registrations, permits and licenses to qualified persons;

Shall have the authority to enter into interstate or intrastate agreements and associations with other boards of licensure for the purpose of establishing reciprocity, developing examinations, evaluating applicants or other activities to enhance the services of the board to the state, the licensee, the registrant, the permittee and the public;

Shall adopt a seal to be affixed to all licenses, registrations and permits issued;

Shall adopt rules not inconsistent with this act or the laws of this state that are reasonable and necessary to administer this act;

May employ a board administrator and any additional staff as necessary to administer and enforce this act and board rules;

Shall have the authority to inspect the premises in which the business of funeral service is conducted, in which the business of cremation of human remains is conducted, where embalming is practiced or where chemical disposition is practiced. For purposes of this paragraph the board may employ a funeral service practitioner licensee of the state of Wyoming as an inspector to aid in the enforcement of this act and rules adopted pursuant thereto, whose compensation and expenses shall be payable only out of the fees collected by the board;

Shall have the authority to receive and investigate complaints, hire investigators and take all appropriate action allowed by law to enforce this act;

Shall conduct hearings as recommended by the complaint investigator on complaints concerning violations of this act and the rules adopted under this act. The board shall have authority to administer oaths, take affidavits, summon witnesses and take testimony as to matters coming within the scope of its duties;

In its own name, may bring an action for an injunction, and courts of this state may enjoin any person from violation of this act. These proceedings shall be prosecuted by the attorney general’s office or private counsel may be secured by the board with approval of the attorney general;

May charge fees for application, examination, licensing, registering, permitting, renewal and any other service provided in amounts established pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

;

Shall adopt rules regulating the lease of caskets to ensure sanitary use. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the lease of a casket for funeral and other services of a person to be cremated shall be authorized by those rules;

Shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to regulate the practice of professional funeral service, including professional conduct, continuing education and discipline.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-510.
Prohibited acts, penalties, injunctive relief.

No person shall:

Engage in the business practice of funeral service, cremation, chemical disposition or other activities defined as part of funeral service practice, unless licensed, registered or permitted to do so under this act or lawfully doing so as an employee of a funeral establishment under the supervision of a funeral service practitioner;

Advertise, represent or in any manner hold himself out as being licensed, registered or permitted to provide the services regulated by this act by use of any title commonly associated with one engaged in the funeral, crematory or funeral service practice without having first complied with this act;

Conduct, direct or supervise any service with human remains present for a fee, compensation or reimbursement without having first complied with this act;

Maintain or operate a building or structure within the state of Wyoming as a funeral establishment in violation of the provisions of this act or the rules and regulations of the board;

Maintain or operate a building or structure within the state of Wyoming as a crematory or chemical disposition facility in violation of the provisions of this act or the rules and regulations of the board; or

Embalm, cremate or chemically dispose of a dead human body when any fact within the knowledge, or brought to the attention, of the licensee, registrant or permittee is sufficient to arouse suspicion of crime in connection with the cause of death of the deceased, until permission of the coroner is obtained.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-511.
Grounds for disciplinary action on licensees, registrations and permits, generally.

The board may refuse to renew, or may deny, suspend, revoke or otherwise restrict a license, registration or permit issued under this act for any of the following acts:

Unprofessional conduct, as defined by rules and regulations of the board;

Failure to make timely and proper application for renewal or failure to meet the continuing education requirements prior to the license, registration or permit expiration date;

Willful violation of any provision of the rules and regulations promulgated by the board;

Willful violation of any provisions of this act.

In addition to the remedies in subsection (a) of this section, the board may impose a civil penalty upon any person who violates this act or a rule or order of the board. The penalty and fees may not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) for each violation of this act or rule promulgated under this act. Fees imposed may include the board’s costs and expenses for the investigation, prosecution and reasonable attorneys’ fees.

The board may initiate proceedings under this act on its own motion or on the written complaint of any person. All proceedings before the board shall be conducted under the rules and regulations adopted by the board and in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license, registration or permit issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license, registration or permit in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license, registration or permit withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection. If a license, registration or permit is suspended or restricted under this subsection, the license, registration or permit may be reissued without a hearing if the department of family services provides notice that the person has complied with the terms of the court order that resulted in the suspension or restriction of the license, registration or permit issued under this act.

In addition to other remedies, the board may assess part or all of the costs of the proceeding against a disciplined licensee, registrant or permittee.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31 § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-512.
Limitation of practice.

All persons licensed, registered or permitted under this act shall adhere to the professional standards of practice promulgated in the rules and regulations of the board. Any person licensed, registered or permitted under this act who refuses or neglects to obey those professional standards of practice shall be subject to discipline.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-513.
Petition for disciplinary action; notice for hearing; review.

A petition for the discipline of a licensee, registrant or permittee may be filed by the attorney general or by the county attorney of the county in which the licensee, registrant or permittee resides or has practiced. The petition shall be filed with the board and the board shall set the matter for hearing in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Petitions for review shall be in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedures.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-514.
Criminal penalty for violation.

Unless otherwise provided for in this act for specific violations, any person violating this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both. A second or subsequent conviction for violation of this act during a thirty-six (36) month period shall constitute a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-515.
Funeral services to be conducted in permitted funeral establishment by licensee or registrant.

The business of a funeral service practice shall be conducted in a funeral establishment that has been issued a permit by the board. Unlicensed individuals employed by a funeral establishment may assist funeral directors and funeral service practitioners in the area of funeral service practice, under the supervision of a licensed funeral service practitioner. Individuals not licensed by the board as funeral service practitioners or registered as apprentice funeral service practitioners shall not conduct other activities incidental to the practice of embalming and shall not embalm, cremate or chemically dispose of human remains, except as otherwise allowed in W.S.

33-16-530

.

History.

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 70, § 1, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

added the exception at the end.

Laws 2015, ch. 70, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-516.
Funeral establishment; permit required; qualifications.

It is unlawful for any person or entity to operate a funeral establishment not permitted by the board.

Every person or entity desiring to operate a funeral establishment within the state of Wyoming shall apply to the board for a funeral establishment permit, upon a form and in the manner prescribed by the board, accompanied by the fee set by the board and satisfactory evidence of the following:

The applicant, unless an organization, is a licensed funeral director licensed prior to July 1, 2014, or a licensed funeral service practitioner. The applicant, when an organization, shall have as an active officer or manager, a person who is a licensed funeral director licensed prior to July 1, 2014, or a licensed funeral service practitioner;

The applicant, unless an organization, has no criminal convictions which would impact upon the applicant’s abilities to operate a funeral establishment in accordance with this act and the rules and regulations of the board. The applicant, when an organization, shall have as an active officer or manager, a person who has no criminal convictions which would impact upon the applicant’s abilities to operate a funeral establishment in accordance with this act and the rules and regulations of the board;

The application shall designate the funeral service practitioner responsible for the funeral establishment, and, if the establishment is operated by a funeral director licensed prior to July 1, 2014, it shall set forth the name and license number of at least one (1) licensed funeral service practitioner employed by the establishment to provide funeral practice services and oversight to the employees of the funeral establishment;

The funeral establishment shall meet the standards required by the rules and regulations of the board and the provisions of this act, and receive a satisfactory inspection by the board.

A funeral establishment engaging in embalming shall have an embalming room equipped with a sanitary floor, embalming table, necessary drainage and ventilation and containing necessary instruments and supplies for the preparation and embalming of human dead bodies for burial or transportation. The floors of the room shall be made of material that is impervious to the absorption of liquid and sanitized. The premises shall be kept in a sanitary condition providing adequate safety measures to all funeral employees and consumers.

If the applicant proposes to operate more than one (1) funeral establishment, the applicant shall make a separate application and procure a separate permit for each separate location.

Any funeral establishment permittee desiring to change the location of the business shall make application to the board at least thirty (30) days prior to the time that the change in location is to take effect unless an emergency change in location is authorized by the board. A fee as established by the board shall accompany the application for the change. The board shall grant the change if the location conforms to the provisions of this act.

Any funeral establishment permittee desiring to change the name of the business shall make application to the board at least thirty (30) days prior to the time the change in name is to take effect. A fee as established by the board shall accompany the application for the change.

Any funeral establishment permittee desiring to change the licensed funeral director or funeral service practitioner in charge of the establishment shall make application to the board immediately. A fee as established by the board shall accompany the application for the change. The change shall not be effective until approved by the board. The board shall by rule and regulation provide for emergencies if a director dies or becomes incapacitated.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-517.
Funeral service practitioner; license required; qualifications.

Persons employed by a funeral establishment may assist funeral directors and funeral service practitioners in the area of funeral directing, under the supervision of a licensed funeral service practitioner. To be licensed as a funeral service practitioner within the state of Wyoming, an applicant shall apply to the board for a funeral service practitioner license, upon a form and in the manner prescribed by the board, accompanied by the appropriate fee and satisfactory evidence of the following:

The applicant has reached the age of majority;

The applicant has no criminal convictions which would impact upon the applicant’s abilities to engage in the practice of funeral service in accordance with this act and the rules and regulations of the board. The board may waive this provision based on individual circumstances;

The applicant has:

Obtained an associates’ or higher degree in funeral service practice or mortuary science from an American board of funeral service education accredited mortuary science program or an equivalent accredited program of funeral service education; or

Obtained a mortuary science diploma from an institution accredited by the American board of funeral service education or an equivalent accreditation and can show evidence of five (5) years of experience in practicing funeral service in another jurisdiction, regardless of whether that jurisdiction has a formal licensing requirement for funeral service practice as defined by W.S. 33-16-502(a)(xvii).

The applicant has completed a one (1) year apprenticeship under the supervision of a Wyoming licensed funeral service practitioner, which shall include practical experience of having assisted in the embalming of at least twenty-five (25) dead human bodies and having assisted in arranging and conducting at least twenty-five (25) funeral or memorial services;

The applicant has passed the National Board Examination as administered by the Conference of Funeral Service Examining Board; and

The applicant has passed an examination administered by authority of the board on the laws, rules and regulations governing the practice of funeral service in Wyoming. The examination may also contain questions relating to funeral service practice and other areas as deemed proper by the board.

History.

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2022 ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, rewrote (a)(iii), which read, “The applicant has completed sixty (60) credit hours at an accredited college or university in the United States, and has separately obtained an associates’ degree in funeral service practice or mortuary science from an accredited program of funeral service education, or, in the alternative, the applicant has received a bachelor degree in funeral service practice or mortuary science. The board may accept education obtained outside the United States on a case by case basis.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

Editor’s note. —

Laws 2022, ch. 25, § 2, provides, “This act shall apply to license applications made on or after July 1, 2022.”

§ 33-16-518.
Funeral director; license required; qualifications.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in the business of funeral directing without being granted a license as a funeral service practitioner or permitted as a funeral director under a permit originally issued prior to July 1, 2014 as provided in W.S.

33-16-520

.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-519.
Apprentice funeral service practitioner; registration required; qualifications.

Individuals apprenticing with a funeral service practitioner, shall be licensed as an apprentice funeral service practitioner by the board prior to beginning the apprenticeship. Apprentice credit shall only be given by the board for time actually spent apprenticing under an apprentice license granted by the board. Every person desiring to be licensed as an apprentice, shall apply to the board upon a form and in the manner prescribed by the board, accompanied by the appropriate fee and satisfactory evidence of the following:

The applicant has reached the age of majority;

The applicant has no criminal convictions which would impact upon the applicant’s abilities to provide the services of an apprentice in accordance with this act and the rules and regulations of the board. The board may waive this provision based on individual circumstances; and

The applicant has passed an examination administered by authority of the board on the laws, rules and regulations governing the practice of funeral service in Wyoming. The examination may also contain questions relating to funeral service topics as deemed proper by the board.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-520.
Licenses, registrations and permits under prior law; recognition given; subject to this act.

Persons who hold a current license in good standing as an embalmer on June 30, 2014, issued by the board of embalmers under prior laws of Wyoming shall be issued a license as a funeral service practitioner under the provisions of this act without additional requirements.

Persons who hold a current permit in good standing as a funeral director on June 30, 2014, issued by the board of embalmers under prior laws of Wyoming, shall be issued a funeral director permit under the provisions of this act without additional requirements, which license may be renewed year after year, unless otherwise suspended or revoked by the board or until the failure of the permittee to renew the permit under this act or the death of the permittee, whichever comes first.

Persons who hold a current permit in good standing as an apprentice embalmer on June 30, 2014, issued by the board of embalmers under prior laws of Wyoming, shall be issued an apprentice permit, as an apprentice funeral service practitioner, under the provisions of this act without additional requirements.

Funeral establishments which hold a current license in good standing associated with a funeral director permittee on June 30, 2014, issued by the board of embalmers under prior laws of Wyoming, shall be issued an establishment permit under the provisions of this act without additional requirements.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-521.
Record keeping for licensees.

The board administrator shall keep a record in which shall be registered the names and residence of all persons to whom a certificate of license has been granted, and the number and date of these licenses. A copy of each individual license shall be furnished to the licensee.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-522.
Out-of-state licensees; reciprocity; state of disaster or emergency; entities and individuals.

The board shall have the power to issue a reciprocal license to an applicant from another jurisdiction that has equal or like educational requirements as required by this state or the board as follows:

A license as a funeral service practitioner may be issued by the board to an out-of-state resident who submits to the board satisfactory evidence that the applicant has met all the requirements of this act, passes an examination determined by the board addressing Wyoming state specific funeral laws and pays the fees required by this act;

The board may issue an appropriate license without further apprenticeship to a resident of a state which has similar educational requirements necessary for reciprocity with this state, if the applicant:

Has a current license to practice as a funeral service practitioner, mortician, undertaker or similar license, in the state of residence of the person;

Has been:

An active funeral service practice licensee and has actually been engaged in funeral service practice for at least three (3) years; or

Practicing funeral service in another jurisdiction that does not have formal licensing requirements for funeral service practice as defined by W.S. 33-16-502(a)(xvii) for at least five (5) years and the applicant meets the education requirements specified by W.S. 33-16-517(a)(iii)(A) or (B).

Has never been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor related to funeral service practice. The board may waive this provision based on individual circumstances;

Has never had a funeral service practice related license revoked or suspended;

Is not currently facing disciplinary action;

Intends to practice in this state;

Has filed documents required by the board;

Has paid the fees as required by this act;

Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States;

Is a graduate of an accredited funeral service education program;

Has passed the national board examination or state board examination; and

Has passed an examination determined by the board addressing Wyoming state specific funeral laws.

In the event of a disaster or a state of emergency, or for the purpose of conducting a bona fide educational program, the board may grant temporary authority to practice funeral service in Wyoming, for the duration of the declared state of emergency or educational program, to an out-of-state licensee upon proof of current license in good standing in his state of residence.

The board may issue an annual or occasional nonresident permit to an individual or entity who does not reside in Wyoming, but who wishes to conduct any service for a fee where human remains are present in the state of Wyoming. The board may issue the permit upon payment of a fee, the amount of which shall be determined by the board, if the applicant can establish that he resides in another state and conducts funeral service operations under the laws of that state.

It is unlawful for out-of-state licensees to bury or dispose of human remains or conduct funeral services within the state of Wyoming without first obtaining a permit to do so from the board.

The board shall promulgate rules under which nonresident licensees shall operate which shall be designed to protect the public.

History.

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2022 ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “license” for “licenses,” “an applicant from another jurisdiction that has” for “applicants licensed in other states which have”; in (a)(ii)(B); designated existing provision as (a)(iii)(B)(I); in (a)(iii)(B)(I), substituted “three (3)” for “five (5),” added “or” at the end; added (a)(ii)(B)(II); and made related changes.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

Editor’s note. —

Laws 2022, ch. 25, § 2, provides, “This act shall apply to license applications made on or after July 1, 2022.”

§ 33-16-523.
Investigation of applicants for license; granting or refusing license.

Upon receipt of an application for an establishment license under this act, the board may cause an investigation to be made as to the character of the applicant, including its officers or members if the application is by or in behalf of business entity, and may require a showing that will reasonably prove that the applicant does not have a background evidencing conduct adverse to the practice of funeral service or to the ability to practice funeral service. The board may subpoena witnesses and administer oaths upon proper notice. After proper hearing, the board shall grant a license if it finds the applicant does not have a background evidencing conduct adverse to the practice of funeral service or to the ability to practice funeral service and the proposed funeral establishment is, or will be, constructed and equipped as required by this act. Every application shall be granted or refused within ninety (90) days from the date of the filing of the application.

History:

2014 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in the first sentence, substituted “that the applicant does not have a background evidencing conduct adverse to the practice of funeral service or to the ability to practice funeral service” for “the good character of the applicant” following “reasonably prove,” and in the third sentence “does not have a background evidencing conduct adverse to the practice of funeral service of to the ability to practice funeral service” for “is of good character” following “applicant.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.